Utah statutes.
32A-10-304.   Commission and department duties before granting permits.
(1) (a)  Before any temporary special event beer permit may be granted by the
commission, the department shall:
(i)  conduct an investigation;
(ii)  gather information; and
(iii)  make recommendations to the commission as to whether or not a permit
should be granted.
(b)  The department shall forward the information and recommendations
described in Subsection (1)(a) to the commission to aid in the commission's
determination.
(2)  Before granting any temporary special event beer permit, the commission
shall:
(a)  determine that the applicant has complied with all basic qualifications
and requirements as provided by Sections 32A-10-302 and 32A-10-303;
(b)  determine that the application is complete;
(c)  consider the times, dates, location, estimated attendance, nature, and
purpose of the temporary special event;
(d)  to minimize the risk of minors being sold or furnished alcohol or adults
being overserved alcohol at the temporary special event, assess the adequacy
of control measures for:
(i)  a large-scale public event where the estimated attendance is in excess of
1,000 people; or
(ii)  an outdoor public event; and
(e)  consider any other factors or circumstances the commission considers
necessary.
(3)  Upon commission approval of any application and upon the granting of a
temporary special event beer permit, the department shall send copies of the
approved application and the permit to state and local law enforcement
authorities before the scheduled event.
